Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-6] Dispensary operations. (a)
No person shall operate a dispensary, nor engage in the production,
manufacture, or sale of marijuana or manufactured marijuana products, unless
the person has obtained a license from the department pursuant to this chapter.

(b) No dispensary licensee, its officers,
employees, or agents shall provide written certification for the use of medical
marijuana or manufactured marijuana products for any person.

(c) No person under the age of twenty-one
shall be employed by a dispensary licensee.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, including but not limited to sections 378-2 and 378-2.5, no
dispensary shall employ a person convicted of a felony. Employment under this
chapter shall be exempt from section 378-2(a)(1), as it relates to arrest and
court record discrimination, and section 378-2.5.

(e) Retail dispensing locations shall not be
open for retail sales before 8:00 a.m. or after 8:00 p.m., Hawaii-Aleutian
Standard Time, Monday through Saturday. Retail dispensing locations shall be
closed on Sundays and official state and federal holidays.

(f) All dispensary facilities, including but
not limited to production centers and retail dispensing locations, shall be
enclosed indoor facilities and shall maintain twenty-four hour security
measures, including but not limited to an alarm system, video monitoring and
recording on the premises, and exterior lighting. Production centers shall
remain locked at all times. Retail dispensing locations shall remain locked at
all times, other than business hours as authorized by subsection (e), and shall
only be opened for authorized persons.

(g) In all dispensary facilities, only the
licensee, if an individual, the registered employees of the dispensary
licensee, and the registered employees of the subcontracted production center
or retail dispensing locations shall be permitted to touch or handle any
marijuana or manufactured marijuana products, except that a qualifying patient
or the primary caregiver of a qualifying patient may receive manufactured
marijuana products at a retail dispensing location following completion of a
sale.

(h) A dispensary shall provide the department
with the address, tax map key number, and a copy of the premises lease, if
applicable, of the proposed location of a production center allowed under a
license for a county not later than thirty days prior to any medical marijuana
or manufactured marijuana products being produced or manufactured at that
production center.

(i) A dispensary shall provide the department with
the address, tax map key number, and a copy of the premises lease, if
applicable, of the proposed location of each retail dispensing location allowed
under a license not less than sixty days prior to opening for business.

(j) The department shall establish, maintain,
and control a computer software tracking system that shall have real time,
twenty-four hour access to the data of all dispensaries relating to:

(1) The total amount of marijuana in possession of all
dispensaries from either seed or immature plant state, including all plants
that are derived from cuttings or cloning, until the marijuana, marijuana
plants, or manufactured marijuana product is sold or destroyed pursuant to
section 329D-7;

(2) The total amount of manufactured marijuana product
inventory, including the equivalent physical weight of marijuana that is used
to manufacture manufactured marijuana products, purchased by a qualifying
patient and primary caregiver from all retail dispensing locations in the State
in any fifteen day period;

(3) The amount of waste produced by each plant at
harvest; and

(4) The transport of marijuana and manufactured
marijuana products between production centers and retail dispensing locations,
including tracking identification issued by the tracking system, the identity
of the person transporting the marijuana or manufactured marijuana products,
and the make, model, and license number of the vehicle being used for the
transport.

The procurement of the computer software tracking
system established pursuant to this subsection shall be exempt from chapter
103D; provided that: the department shall publicly solicit at least three
proposals for the computer software tracking system; and the selection of the
computer software tracking system shall be approved by the director of the
department and the chief information officer.

(k) A dispensary licensed pursuant to this
chapter shall purchase, operate, and maintain a computer software tracking
system that shall:

(1) Interface with the department's computer software
tracking system established pursuant to subsection (j);

(2) Allow each licensed dispensary's production
center to submit to the department in real time, by automatic identification
and data capture, all marijuana, marijuana plants, and manufactured marijuana
product inventory in possession of that dispensary from either seed or immature
plant state, including all plants that are derived from cuttings or cloning,
until the marijuana or manufactured marijuana product is sold or destroyed
pursuant to section 329D-7; and

(3) Allow the licensed dispensary's retail dispensing
location to submit to the department in real time for the total amount of
marijuana and manufactured marijuana product purchased by a qualifying patient
and primary caregiver from the dispensary's retail dispensing locations in the
State in any fifteen day period; provided that the software tracking system
shall impose an automatic stopper in real time, which cannot be overridden, on
any further purchases of marijuana or manufactured marijuana products, if the
maximum allowable amount of marijuana has already been purchased for the
applicable fifteen day period; provided further that additional purchases shall
not be permitted until the next applicable period.

(l) No free samples of marijuana or
manufactured marijuana products shall be provided at any time, and no
consumption of marijuana or manufactured marijuana products shall be permitted
on any dispensary premises.

(m) A dispensary shall not transport marijuana
or manufactured marijuana products to another county or another island.

(n) A dispensary shall be prohibited from
off-premises delivery of marijuana or manufactured marijuana products to
qualifying patients or to primary caregivers of qualifying patients.

(o) A dispensary shall not:

(1) Display marijuana or manufactured marijuana
products in windows or in public view; or

(2) Post any signage other than a single sign no
greater than one thousand six hundred square inches bearing only the business
or trade name in text without any pictures or illustrations; provided that if
any applicable law or ordinance restricting outdoor signage is more
restrictive, that law or ordinance shall govern.

(p) No marijuana or manufactured marijuana
products shall be transported to, from, or within any federal fort or arsenal,
national park or forest, any other federal enclave, or any other property
possessed or occupied by the federal government.

(q) A dispensary licensed pursuant to this chapter
shall be prohibited from providing written certification pursuant to section 329-122
for the use of medical marijuana for any person. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next